Wernher von Braun From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia Jump to navigation Jump to search German, later American, aerospace engineer and space architect Wernher von Braun Von Braun in 1960 Born Wernher Magnus Maximilian, Freiherr von Braun  1912-03-23  March 23, 1912 Wirsitz, Posen Province , German Empire now Wyrzysk , Poland  Died June 16, 1977 1977-06-16 aged  65 Alexandria, Virginia , U.S. Burial place Ivy Hill Cemetery Alexandria, Virginia 1  Citizenship Germany, United States after 1955 Alma  mater Technical University of Berlin Occupation Rocket engineer and designer, aerospace project manager Known  for NASA engineering program manager chief architect of the Apollo Saturn V rocket Spouses Maria Luise von Quistorp  m.  1947 1977  Children Iris Careen 1948 Margrit Ccile 1952 Peter Constantine 1960 Parents Magnus von Braun 18781972 Emmy von Quistorp 18861959 Awards Elliott Cresson Medal 1962 Wilhelm Exner Medal 1969 2  National Medal of Science 1975 Military career Allegiance   Nazi Germany   United States Service branch SS   United States Army Years  of service 19371945 Germany 19451960 US Rank  SS- Sturmbannfhrer major Awards Knights Cross of the War Merit Cross with Swords 1944 War Merit Cross , First Class with Swords 1943 Wernher Magnus Maximilian Freiherr von Braun March 23, 1912  June 16, 1977 was a German and later American aerospace engineer 3  and space architect . He was the leading figure in the development of rocket technology in Germany and a pioneer of rocket technology and space science in the United States. 4  While in his twenties and early thirties, von Braun worked in Nazi Germany s rocket development program. He helped design and develop the V-2 rocket at Peenemnde during World War II . Following the war, he was secretly moved to the United States, along with about 1,600 other German scientists, engineers, and technicians, as part of Operation Paperclip . 5  He worked for the United States Army on an intermediate-range ballistic missile program, and he developed the rockets that launched the United States first space satellite Explorer 1 . His group was assimilated into NASA , where he served as director of the newly formed Marshall Space Flight Center and as the chief architect of the Saturn V super heavy-lift launch vehicle that propelled the Apollo spacecraft to the Moon. 6  7  In 1967, von Braun was inducted into the National Academy of Engineering and in 1975, he received the National Medal of Science . He advocated a human mission to Mars . Contents 1 Early life and education 2 Career in Germany 2.1 Involvement with the Nazi regime 2.1.1 Party membership 2.1.2 Membership in the Allgemeine SS 2.2 Work under Nazi regime 2.3 Experiments with rocket aircraft 2.4 Slave labor 2.5 Arrest and release by the Nazi regime 2.6 Surrender to the Americans 3 American career 3.1 U.S. Army career 3.2 Popular concepts for a human presence in space 3.3 Religious conversion 3.4 Concepts for orbital warfare 3.5 NASA career 3.6 Career after NASA 4 Engineering philosophy 5 Personal life 6 Death 7 Recognition and critique 8 Summary of SS career 8.1 Dates of rank 9 Honors 10 In popular culture 11 Published works 12 See also 13 References 14 Further reading 15 External links Early life and education  edit  Wernher von Braun was born on March 23, 1912, in the small town of Wirsitz in the Posen Province , then the German Empire . He was the second of three sons of a noble Lutheran family. From birth he held the title of Freiherr equivalent to Baron . The German nobility s legal privileges were abolished in 1919, although noble titles could still be used as part of the family name. His father, Magnus Freiherr von Braun 18781972, was a civil servant and conservative politician he served as Minister of Agriculture in the federal government during the Weimar Republic . His mother, Emmy von Quistorp 18861959, traced her ancestry through both parents to medieval European royalty and was a descendant of Philip III of France , Valdemar I of Denmark , Robert III of Scotland , and Edward III of England . 8  9  Wernher had an older brother, the West German diplomat Sigismund von Braun , who served as Secretary of State in the Foreign Office in the 1970s, and a younger brother, also named Magnus von Braun , who was a rocket scientist and later a senior executive with Chrysler . 10  After Wernhers Confirmation , his mother gave him a telescope , and he developed a passion for astronomy . The family moved to Berlin in 1915, where his father worked at the Ministry of the Interior. 11  Here in 1924, the 12-year-old Wernher, inspired by speed records established by Max Valier and Fritz von Opel in rocket-propelled cars, 12  caused a major disruption in a crowded street by detonating a toy wagon to which he had attached fireworks. He was taken into custody by the local police until his father came to get him. Wernher learned to play both the cello and the piano at an early age and at one time wanted to become a composer. He took lessons from the composer Paul Hindemith . The few pieces of Wernhers youthful compositions that exist are reminiscent of Hindemiths style. 13   11 He could play piano pieces of Beethoven and Bach from memory. Beginning in 1925, Wernher attended a boarding school at Ettersburg Castle near Weimar , where he did not do well in physics and mathematics. There he acquired a copy of By Rocket into Planetary Space  Die Rakete zu den Planetenrumen , 1923 14  by rocket pioneer Hermann Oberth . In 1928, his parents moved him to the Hermann-Lietz-Internat also a residential school on the East Frisian North Sea island of Spiekeroog . Space travel had always fascinated Wernher, and from then on he applied himself to physics and mathematics to pursue his interest in rocket engineering. In 1930, von Braun attended the Technische Hochschule Berlin , where he joined the Spaceflight Society  Verein fr Raumschiffahrt or VfR and assisted Willy Ley in his liquid-fueled rocket motor tests in conjunction with Hermann Oberth . 15  In spring 1932, he graduated with a diploma in mechanical engineering . 16  His early exposure to rocketry convinced him that the exploration of space would require far more than applications of the current engineering technology. Wanting to learn more about physics , chemistry , and astronomy , von Braun entered the Friedrich-Wilhelm University of Berlin for post-graduate studies and graduated with a doctorate in physics in 1934. 17  He also studied at ETH Zrich for a term from June to October 1931. 18  Although he worked mainly on military rockets in his later years there, space travel remained his primary interest. In 1930, von Braun attended a presentation given by Auguste Piccard . After the talk, the young student approached the famous pioneer of high-altitude balloon flight, and stated to him You know, I plan on traveling to the Moon at some time. Piccard is said to have responded with encouraging words. 19  Von Braun was greatly influenced by Oberth, of whom he said .mw-parser-output .templatequoteoverflowhiddenmargin1em 0padding0 40px.mw-parser-output .templatequote .templatequoteciteline-height1.5emtext-alignleftpadding-left1.6emmargin-top0 Hermann Oberth was the first who, when thinking about the possibility of spaceships, grabbed a slide-rule and presented mathematically analyzed concepts and designs ... I, myself, owe to him not only the guiding-star of my life, but also my first contact with the theoretical and practical aspects of rocketry and space travel. A place of honor should be reserved in the history o f science and technology for his ground-breaking contributions in the field of astronautics. 20  Career in Germany  edit  According to historian Norman Davies , von Braun was able to pursue a career as a rocket scientist in Germany due to a curious oversight in the Treaty of Versailles which did not include rocketry in its list of weapons forbidden to Germany. 21  Involvement with the Nazi regime  edit  Von Braun with Fritz Todt , who utilized forced labor for major works across occupied Europe Party membership  edit  Von Braun had an ambivalent and complex relationship with the Nazi Third Reich . 5  He applied for membership of the Nazi Party on November 12, 1937, and was issued membership number 5,738,692. 22   96 Michael J. Neufeld, an author of aerospace history and chief of the Space History Division at the Smithsonians National Air and Space Museum , wrote that ten years after von Braun obtained his Nazi Party membership, he signed an affidavit for the U.S. Army misrepresenting the year of his membership, saying incorrectly 22   96 In 1939, I was officially demanded to join the National Socialist Party. At this time I was already Technical Director at the Army Rocket Center at Peenemnde Baltic Sea. The technical work carried out there had, in the meantime, attracted more and more attention in higher levels. Thus, my refusal to join the party would have meant that I would have to abandon the work of my life. Therefore, I decided to join. My membership in the party did not involve any political activity. It has not been ascertained whether von Brauns error with regard to the year was deliberate or a simple mistake. 22   96 Neufeld further wrote Von Braun, like other Peenemnders, was assigned to the local group in Karlshagen there is no evidence that he did more than send in his monthly dues. But he is seen in some photographs with the partys swastika pin in his lapel  it was politically useful to demonstrate his membership. 22   96 Von Brauns later attitude toward the National Socialist regime of the late 1930s and early 1940s was complex. He said that he had been so influenced by the early Nazi promise of release from the postWorld War I economic effects , that his patriotic feelings had increased.  citation needed  In a 1952 memoir article he admitted that, at that time, he fared relatively rather well under totalitarianism . 22   9697 Yet, he also wrote that to us, Hitler was still only a pompous fool with a Charlie Chaplin moustache 23  and that he perceived him as another Napoleon  who was wholly without scruples, a godless man who thought himself the only god. 24  Membership in the Allgemeine SS  edit  Von Braun joined the SS horseback riding school on 1 November 1933 as an SS- Anwrter . He left the following year.  citation needed   63 In 1940, he joined the SS 25   47 26  and was given the rank of Untersturmfhrer in the Allgemeine SS and issued membership number 185,068.  citation needed   121 In 1947, he gave the U.S. War Department this explanation In spring 1940, one SS-Standartenfuehrer SS-colonel Mueller from Greifswald, a bigger town in the vicinity of Peenemnde, looked me up in my office ... and told me that Reichsfuehrer SS Himmler had sent him with the order to urge me to join the SS. I told him I was so busy with my rocket work that I had no time to spare for any political activity. He then told me, that ... the SS would cost me no time at all. I would be awarded the rank of an Untersturmfuehrer lieutenant and it were  sic  a very definite desire of Himmler that I attend his invitation to join. I asked Mueller to give me some time for reflection. He agreed. Realizing that the matter was of highly political significance for the relation between the SS and the Army, I called immediately on my military superior, Dr. Dornberger. He informed me that the SS had for a long time been trying to get their finger in the pie of the rocket work. I asked him what to do. He replied on the spot that if I wanted to continue our mutual work, I had no alternative but to join. When shown a picture of himself standing behind Himmler, von Braun claimed to have worn the SS uniform only that one time, 27  but in 2002 a former SS officer at Peenemnde told the BBC that von Braun had regularly worn the SS uniform to official meetings. He began as an Untersturmfhrer Second lieutenant and was promoted three times by Himmler, the last time in June 1943 to SS- Sturmbannfhrer Major. Von Braun later claimed that these were simply technical promotions received each year regularly by mail. 28  Work under Nazi regime  edit  First rank, from left to right, General Dr Walter Dornberger partially hidden, General Friedrich Olbricht with Knights Cross, Major Heinz Brandt, and Wernher von Braun in civilian dress at Peenemnde , in March 1941. In 1933, von Braun was working on his creative doctorate when the National Socialist German Workers Party NSDAP, or Nazi Party came to power in a coalition government in Germany rocketry was almost immediately moved onto the national agenda. An artillery captain, Walter Dornberger , arranged an Ordnance Department research grant for von Braun, who then worked next to Dornbergers existing solid-fuel rocket test site at Kummersdorf . Von Braun was awarded a doctorate in physics 29   aerospace engineering  on July 27, 1934, from the University of Berlin for a thesis entitled About Combustion Tests  his doctoral supervisor was Erich Schumann . 22   61 However, this thesis was only the public part of von Brauns work. His actual full thesis, Construction, Theoretical, and Experimental Solution to the Problem of the Liquid Propellant Rocket dated April 16, 1934 was kept classified by the German army, and was not published until 1960. 30  By the end of 1934, his group had successfully launched two liquid fuel rockets that rose to heights of 2.2 and 3.5  km 2  mi. At the time, Germany was highly interested in American physicist Robert H. Goddard s research. Before 1939, German scientists occasionally contacted Goddard directly with technical questions. Von Braun used Goddards plans from various journals and incorporated them into the building of the Aggregat A series of rockets . The A-4 rocket would become well known as the V-2. 31  In 1963, von Braun reflected on the history of rocketry, and said of Goddards work His rockets  ... may have been rather crude by present-day standards, but they blazed the trail and incorporated many features used in our most modern rockets and space vehicles. 12  Goddard confirmed his work was used by von Braun in 1944, shortly before the Nazis began firing V-2s at England. A V-2 crashed in Sweden and some parts were sent to an Annapolis lab where Goddard was doing research for the Navy. If this was the so-called Bckebo Bomb , it had been procured by the British in exchange for Spitfires  Annapolis would have received some parts from them. Goddard is reported to have recognized components he had invented, and inferred that his brainchild had been turned into a weapon. 32  Later, von Braun would comment I have very deep and sincere regret for the victims of the V-2 rockets, but there were victims on both sides ... A war is a war, and when my country is at war, my duty is to help win that war. 33  In response to Goddards claims, von Braun said at no time in Germany did I or any of my associates ever see a Goddard patent. This was independently confirmed. 34  He wrote that claims about him lifting Goddards work were the furthest from the truth, noting that Goddards paper A Method of Reaching Extreme Altitudes, which was studied by von Braun and Oberth, lacked the specificity of liquid-fuel experimentation with rockets. 34  It was also confirmed that he was responsible for an estimated 20 patentable innovations related to rocketry during the Volksverhetzung era, as well as receiving U.S. patents after the war concerning the advancement of rocketry. 34  Documented accounts also stated he provided solutions to a host of aerospace engineering problems in the 1950s and 60s. 34  There were no German rocket societies after the collapse of the VfR , and civilian rocket tests were forbidden by the new Nazi regime . Only military development was allowed, and to this end, a larger facility was erected at the village of Peenemnde in northern Germany on the Baltic Sea . Dornberger became the military commander at Peenemnde, with von Braun as technical director. In collaboration with the Luftwaffe , the Peenemnde group developed liquid-fuel rocket engines for aircraft and jet-assisted takeoffs . They also developed the long-range A-4 ballistic missile and the supersonic Wasserfall anti-aircraft missile . Schematic of the A4V2 On December 22, 1942, Adolf Hitler ordered the production of the A-4 as a vengeance weapon, and the Peenemnde group developed it to target London. Following von Brauns July 7, 1943 presentation of a color movie showing an A-4 taking off, Hitler was so enthusiastic that he personally made von Braun a professor shortly thereafter. 35  In Germany at this time, this was an exceptional promotion for an engineer who was only 31 years old. By that time, the British and Soviet intelligence agencies were aware of the rocket program and von Brauns team at Peenemnde, based on the intelligence provided by the Polish underground Home Army . Over the nights of August 1718, 1943, RAF Bomber Command s Operation Hydra dispatched raids on the Peenemnde camp consisting of 596 aircraft, and dropped 1,800 tons of explosives. 36  The facility was salvaged and most of the engineering team remained unharmed however, the raids killed von Brauns engine designer Walter Thiel and Chief Engineer Walther, and the rocket program was delayed. 37  38  See also Bombing of Peenemnde in World War II The first combat A-4, renamed the V-2  Vergeltungswaffe 2 RetaliationVengeance Weapon 2 for propaganda purposes, was launched toward England on September 7, 1944, only 21 months after the project had been officially commissioned. Von Brauns interest in rockets was specifically for the application of space travel , not for killing people. 39  After hearing the news from London, he said that the rocket worked perfectly, except for landing on the wrong planet. Satirist Mort Sahl has been credited with mocking von Braun by saying I aim at the stars, but sometimes I hit London. 40  That line appears in the film I Aim at the Stars , a 1960 biopic of von Braun. Experiments with rocket aircraft  edit  During 1936, von Brauns rocketry team working at Kummersdorf investigated installing liquid-fuelled rockets in aircraft. Ernst Heinkel enthusiastically supported their efforts, supplying a He-72 and later two He-112s for the experiments. Later in 1936, Erich Warsitz was seconded by the RLM to von Braun and Heinkel, because he had been recognized as one of the most experienced test pilots of the time, and because he also had an extraordinary fund of technical knowledge. 41   30 After he familiarized Warsitz with a test-stand run, showing him the corresponding apparatus in the aircraft, he asked Are you with us and will you test the rocket in the air Then, Warsitz, you will be a famous man. And later we will fly to the Moon  with you at the helm 41   35 A regular He 112 In June 1937, at Neuhardenberg a large field about 70  km 43  mi east of Berlin, listed as a reserve airfield in the event of war, one of these latter aircraft was flown with its piston engine shut down during flight by Warsitz, at which time it was propelled by von Brauns rocket power alone. Despite a wheels-up landing and the fuselage having been on fire, it proved to official circles that an aircraft could be flown satisfactorily with a back-thrust system through the rear. 41   51 At the same time, Hellmuth Walter s experiments into hydrogen peroxide based rockets were leading towards light and simple rockets that appeared well-suited for aircraft installation. Also the firm of Hellmuth Walter at Kiel had been commissioned by the RLM to build a rocket engine for the He 112 , so there were two different new rocket motor designs at Neuhardenberg whereas von Brauns engines were powered by alcohol and liquid oxygen, Walter engines had hydrogen peroxide and calcium permanganate as a catalyst . Von Brauns engines used direct combustion and created fire, the Walter devices used hot vapors from a chemical reaction, but both created thrust and provided high speed. 41   41 The subsequent flights with the He-112 used the Walter-rocket instead of von Brauns it was more reliable, simpler to operate, and safer for the test pilot, Warsitz. 41   55 Slave labor  edit  SS General Hans Kammler , who as an engineer had constructed several concentration camps , including Auschwitz , had a reputation for brutality and had originated the idea of using concentration camp prisoners as slave laborers in the rocket program. Arthur Rudolph , chief engineer of the V-2 rocket factory at Peenemnde, endorsed this idea in April 1943 when a labor shortage developed. More people died building the V-2 rockets than were killed by it as a weapon. 42  Von Braun admitted visiting the plant at Mittelwerk on many occasions 5  , and called conditions at the plant repulsive, but claimed never to have witnessed any deaths or beatings, although it had become clear to him by 1944 that deaths had occurred. 43  He denied ever having visited the Mittelbau-Dora concentration camp itself, where 20,000 died from illness, beatings, hangings, and intolerable working conditions. 44  Some prisoners claim von Braun engaged in brutal treatment or approved of it. Guy Morand, a French resistance fighter who was a prisoner in Dora, testified in 1995 that after an apparent sabotage attempt, von Braun ordered a prisoner to be flogged, 45  while Robert Cazabonne, another French prisoner, claimed von Braun stood by as prisoners were hanged by chains suspended by cranes. 45   123124 However, these accounts may have been a case of mistaken identity. 46  Former Buchenwald inmate Adam Cabala claims that von Braun went to the concentration camp to pick slave laborers ... also the German scientists led by Prof. Wernher von Braun were aware of everything daily. As they went along the corridors, they saw the exhaustion of the inmates, their arduous work and their pain. Not one single time did Prof. Wernher von Braun protest against this cruelty during his frequent stays at Dora. Even the aspect of corpses did not touch him On a small area near the ambulance shed, inmates tortured to death by slave labor and the terror of the overseers were piling up daily. But, Prof. Wernher von Braun passed them so close that he was almost touching the corpses. 47  Von Braun later claimed that he was aware of the treatment of prisoners, but felt helpless to change the situation. 48  Arrest and release by the Nazi regime  edit  According to Andr Sellier, a French historian and survivor of the Mittelbau-Dora concentration camp, Heinrich Himmler had von Braun come to his Feldkommandostelle Hochwald HQ in East Prussia in February 1944. 49  To increase his power-base within the Nazi regime, Himmler was conspiring to use Kammler to gain control of all German armament programs, including the V-2 program at Peenemnde. 13   3840 He therefore recommended that von Braun work more closely with Kammler to solve the problems of the V-2. Von Braun claimed to have replied that the problems were merely technical and he was confident that they would be solved with Dornbergers assistance. Von Braun had been under SD surveillance since October 1943. A report stated that he and his colleagues Riedel and Grttrup were said to have expressed regret at an engineers house one evening that they were not working on a spaceship 5  and that they felt the war was not going well this was considered a defeatist attitude. A young female dentist who was an SS spy reported their comments. 13   3840 Combined with Himmlers false charges that von Braun was a communist sympathizer and had attempted to sabotage the V-2 program, and considering that von Braun regularly piloted his government-provided airplane that might allow him to escape to England, this led to his arrest by the Gestapo . 13   3840 The unsuspecting von Braun was detained on March 14 or March 15, 50  1944, and was taken to a Gestapo cell in Stettin now Szczecin, Poland, 13   3840 where he was held for two weeks without knowing the charges against him. Through the Abwehr in Berlin, Dornberger obtained von Brauns conditional release and Albert Speer , Reichsminister for Munitions and War Production, persuaded Hitler to reinstate von Braun so that the V-2 program could continue 5  13   3840 or turn into a V-4 program which in their view would be impossible without von Brauns leadership. 51  In his memoirs, Speer states Hitler had finally conceded that von Braun was to be protected from all prosecution as long as he is indispensable, difficult though the general consequences arising from the situation. 52  Surrender to the Americans  edit  Von Braun, with his arm in a cast due to a car accident, surrendered to the Americans just before this May 3, 1945 photo. The Soviet Army was about 160  km 100  mi from Peenemnde in early 1945 when von Braun assembled his planning staff and asked them to decide how and to whom they should surrender. Unwilling to go to the Soviets, von Braun and his staff decided to try to surrender to the Americans. Kammler had ordered relocation of his team to central Germany however, a conflicting order from an army chief ordered them to join the army and fight. Deciding that Kammlers order was their best bet to defect to the Americans, von Braun fabricated documents and transported 500 of his affiliates to the area around Mittelwerk, where they resumed their work. For fear of their documents being destroyed by the SS, von Braun ordered the blueprints to be hidden in an abandoned mine shaft in the Harz mountain range. 53  While on an official trip in March, von Braun suffered a complicated fracture of his left arm and shoulder in a car accident after his driver fell asleep at the wheel. His injuries were serious, but he insisted that his arm be set in a cast so he could leave the hospital. Due to this neglect of the injury he had to be hospitalized again a month later where his bones had to be rebroken and realigned. 53  In April, as the Allied forces advanced deeper into Germany, Kammler ordered the engineering team to be moved by train into the town of Oberammergau in the Bavarian Alps , where they were closely guarded by the SS with orders to execute the team if they were about to fall into enemy hands. However, von Braun managed to convince SS Major Kummer to order the dispersal of the group into nearby villages so that they would not be an easy target for U.S. bombers. 53  Von Braun and a large number of the engineering team subsequently made it to Austria. 54  On May 2, 1945, upon finding an American private from the U.S. 44th Infantry Division , von Brauns brother and fellow rocket engineer, Magnus, approached the soldier on a bicycle, calling out in broken English My name is Magnus von Braun. My brother invented the V-2. We want to surrender. 10  55  After the surrender, Wernher von Braun spoke to the press We knew that we had created a new means of warfare, and the question as to what nation, to what victorious nation we were willing to entrust this brainchild of ours was a moral decision more than anything else. We wanted to see the world spared another conflict such as Germany had just been through, and we felt that only by surrendering such a weapon to people who are guided not by the laws of materialism but by Christianity and humanity could such an assurance to the world be best secured. 56  The American high command was well aware of how important their catch was von Braun had been at the top of the Black List , the code name for the list of German scientists and engineers targeted for immediate interrogation by U.S. military experts. On June 9, 1945, two days before the scheduled handover of the Nordhausen area to the Soviets, U.S. Army Major Robert B. Staver, Chief of the Jet Propulsion Section of the Research and Intelligence Branch of the U.S. Army Ordnance Corps in London, and Lt Col R. L. Williams took von Braun and his department chiefs by Jeep from Garmisch to Munich, from where they were flown to Nordhausen on the next day, the group was evacuated 40 miles 64  km southwest to Witzenhausen , a small town in the American Zone . 57  Von Braun was briefly detained at the Dustbin interrogation center at Kransberg Castle , where the elite of the Third Reichs economic, scientific and technological sectors were debriefed by U.S. and British intelligence officials. 58  Initially, he was recruited to the U.S. under a program called Operation Overcast , subsequently known as Operation Paperclip . There is evidence, however, that British intelligence and scientists were the first to interview him in depth, eager to gain information that they knew U.S. officials would deny them. The team included the young L.S. Snell, then the leading British rocket engineer, later chief designer of Rolls-Royce Limited and inventor of the Concorde s engines. The specific information the British gleaned remained top secret, both from the Americans and other allies.  citation needed  American career  edit  U.S. Army career  edit  Wernher von Braun at a meeting of NACA s Special Committee on Space Technology, 1958 On June 20, 1945, the U.S. Secretary of State approved the transfer of von Braun and his specialists to the United States however, this was not announced to the public until October 1, 1945. 59  Von Braun was among those scientists for whom the Joint Intelligence Objectives Agency JIOA arguably falsified employment histories and expunged NSDAP memberships.  citation needed  The first seven technicians arrived in the United States at New Castle Army Air Field , just south of Wilmington , Delaware, on September 20, 1945. They were then flown to Boston and taken by boat to the Army Intelligence Service post at Fort Strong in Boston Harbor . Later, with the exception of von Braun, the men were transferred to Aberdeen Proving Ground in Maryland to sort out the Peenemnde documents, enabling the scientists to continue their rocketry experiments.  citation needed  Finally, von Braun and his remaining Peenemnde staff see List of German rocket scientists in the United States  were transferred to their new home at Fort Bliss , a large Army installation just north of El Paso . Von Braun would later write he found it hard to develop a genuine emotional attachment to his new surroundings. 60  His chief design engineer Walther Reidel became the subject of a December 1946 article German Scientist Says American Cooking Tasteless Dislikes Rubberized Chicken, exposing the presence of von Brauns team in the country and drawing criticism from Albert Einstein and John Dingell . 60  Requests to improve their living conditions such as laying linoleum over their cracked wood flooring were rejected. 60  Von Braun remarked, at Peenemnde we had been coddled, here you were counting pennies. 60  Whereas von Braun had thousands of engineers who answered to him at Peenemnde, he was now subordinate to pimply 26-year-old Jim Hamill, an Army major who possessed only an undergraduate degree in engineering. 60  His loyal Germans still addressed him as Herr Professor, but Hamill addressed him as Wernher and never responded to von Brauns request for more materials. Every proposal for new rocket ideas was dismissed. 60  Von Brauns badge at ABMA 1957 While at Fort Bliss, they trained military, industrial, and university personnel in the intricacies of rockets and guided missiles. As part of the Hermes project , they helped refurbish, assemble, and launch a number of V-2s that had been shipped from Germany to the White Sands Proving Ground in New Mexico . They also continued to study the future potential of rockets for military and research applications. Since they were not permitted to leave Fort Bliss without military escort, von Braun and his colleagues began to refer to themselves only half-jokingly as PoPs  Prisoners of Peace. 61  In 1950, at the start of the Korean War , von Braun and his team were transferred to Huntsville, Alabama , his home for the next 20 years. Between 1952 and 1956, 62  von Braun led the Armys rocket development team at Redstone Arsenal , resulting in the Redstone rocket , which was used for the first live nuclear ballistic missile tests conducted by the United States. He personally witnessed this historic launch and detonation. 63  Work on the Redstone led to development of the first high-precision inertial guidance system on the Redstone rocket. 64  As director of the Development Operations Division of the Army Ballistic Missile Agency , von Braun, with his team, then developed the Jupiter-C , a modified Redstone rocket. 65  The Jupiter-C successfully launched the Wests first satellite, Explorer 1 , on January 31, 1958. This event signaled the birth of Americas space program. Despite the work on the Redstone rocket, the 12 years from 1945 to 1957 were probably some of the most frustrating for von Braun and his colleagues. In the Soviet Union , Sergei Korolev and his team of scientists and engineers plowed ahead with several new rocket designs and the Sputnik program, while the American government was not very interested in von Brauns work or views and embarked only on a very modest rocket-building program. In the meantime, the press tended to dwell on von Brauns past as a member of the SS and the slave labor used to build his V-2 rockets.  citation needed  Popular concepts for a human presence in space  edit  This section needs additional citations for verification . Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources . Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. Find sources   Wernher von Braun     news    newspapers    books    scholar    JSTOR  January 2018   Learn how and when to remove this template message  Repeating the pattern he had established during his earlier career in Germany, von Braun  while directing military rocket development in the real world  continued to entertain his engineer-scientists dream of a future in which rockets would be used for space exploration . However, he was no longer at risk of being sacked  as American public opinion of Germans began to recover, von Braun found himself increasingly in a position to popularize his ideas. The May 14, 1950, headline of The Huntsville Times Dr. von Braun Says Rocket Flights Possible to Moon might have marked the beginning of these efforts. Von Brauns ideas rode a publicity wave that was created by science fiction movies and stories. Von Braun with President Dwight D. Eisenhower , 1960 In 1952, von Braun first published his concept of a crewed space station in a Colliers Weekly magazine series of articles titled  Man Will Conquer Space Soon . These articles were illustrated by the space artist Chesley Bonestell and were influential in spreading his ideas. Frequently, von Braun worked with fellow German-born space advocate and science writer Willy Ley to publish his concepts, which, unsurprisingly, were heavy on the engineering side and anticipated many technical aspects of space flight that later became reality. The space station to be constructed using rockets with recoverable and reusable ascent stages would be a toroid structure, with a diameter of 250 feet 76  m this built on the concept of a rotating wheel-shaped station introduced in 1929 by Herman Potonik in his book The Problem of Space Travel  The Rocket Motor . The space station would spin around a central docking nave to provide artificial gravity , and would be assembled in a 1,075-mile 1,730  km two-hour, high-inclination Earth orbit allowing observation of essentially every point on Earth on at least a daily basis. The ultimate purpose of the space station would be to provide an assembly platform for crewed lunar expeditions. More than a decade later, the movie version of 2001 A Space Odyssey would draw heavily on the design concept in its visualization of an orbital space station. Von Braun envisioned these expeditions as very large-scale undertakings, with a total of 50  astronauts traveling in three huge spacecraft two for crew, one primarily for cargo, each 49  m 160.76  ft long and 33  m 108.27  ft in diameter and driven by a rectangular array of 30  rocket propulsion engines. 66  Upon arrival, astronauts would establish a permanent lunar base in the Sinus Roris region by using the emptied cargo holds of their craft as shelters, and would explore their surroundings for eight weeks. This would include a 400  km 249  mi expedition in pressurized rovers to the crater Harpalus and the Mare Imbrium foothills. Walt Disney and von Braun, seen in 1954 holding a model of his passenger ship, collaborated on a series of three educational films. At this time, von Braun also worked out preliminary concepts for a human mission to Mars that used the space station as a staging point. His initial plans, published in The Mars Project 1952, had envisaged a fleet of 10 spacecraft each with a mass of 3,720 metric tonnes, three of them uncrewed and each carrying one 200-tonne winged lander 66  in addition to cargo, and nine crew vehicles transporting a total of 70  astronauts. Gigantic as this mission plan was, its engineering and astronautical parameters were thoroughly calculated. A later project was much more modest, using only one purely orbital cargo ship and one crewed craft. In each case, the expedition would use minimum-energy Hohmann transfer orbits for its trips to Mars and back to Earth. Before technically formalizing his thoughts on human spaceflight to Mars, von Braun had written a science fiction novel on the subject, set in the year 1980. However, the manuscript was rejected by no fewer than 18  publishers. 67  Von Braun later published small portions of this opus in magazines, to illustrate selected aspects of his Mars project popularizations. The complete manuscript, titled Project MARS A Technical Tale , did not appear as a printed book until December 2006. 68  In the hope that its involvement would bring about greater public interest in the future of the space program, von Braun also began working with Walt Disney and the Disney studios as a technical director, initially for three television films about space exploration. The initial broadcast devoted to space exploration was Man in Space , which first went on air on March 9, 1955, drawing 40 million viewers. 60  69  70  Later in 1959 von Braun published a short booklet, condensed from episodes that had appeared in This Week Magazine beforedescribing his updated concept of the first crewed lunar landing. 71  The scenario included only a single and relatively small spacecrafta winged lander with a crew of only two experienced pilots who had already circumnavigated the Moon on an earlier mission. The brute-force direct ascent flight schedule used a rocket design with five sequential stages, loosely based on the Nova designs that were under discussion at this time. After a night launch from a Pacific island, the first three stages would bring the spacecraft with the two remaining upper stages attached to terrestrial escape velocity , with each burn creating an acceleration of 89 times standard gravity . Residual propellant in the third stage would be used for the deceleration intended to commence only a few hundred kilometers above the landing site in a crater near the lunar north pole. The fourth stage provided acceleration to lunar escape velocity, while the fifth stage would be responsible for a deceleration during return to the Earth to a residual speed that allows aerocapture of the spacecraft ending in a runway landing, much in the way of the Space Shuttle . One remarkable feature of this technical tale is that the engineer von Braun anticipated a medical phenomenon that would become apparent only years later being a veteran astronaut with no history of serious adverse reactions to weightlessness offers no protection against becoming unexpectedly and violently spacesick . Religious conversion  edit  In the first half of his life, von Braun was a nonpracticing, perfunctory Lutheran, whose affiliation was nominal and not taken seriously. 72  As described by Ernst Stuhlinger and Frederick I. Ordway III  Throughout his younger years, von Braun did not show signs of religious devotion, or even an interest in things related to the church or to biblical teachings. In fact, he was known to his friends as a merry heathen  frhlicher Heide . 73  Nevertheless, in 1945 he explained his decision to surrender to the Western Allies, rather than Russians, as being influenced by a desire to share rocket technology with people who followed the Bible. In 1946, 74   469 he attended church in El Paso , Texas, and underwent a religious conversion to evangelical Christianity . 75  In an unnamed religious magazine he stated One day in Fort Bliss , a neighbor called and asked if I would like to go to church with him. I accepted, because I wanted to see if the American church was just a country club as Id been led to expect. Instead, I found a small, white frame building ... in the hot Texas sun on a browned-grass lot ... Together, these people make a live, vibrant community. This was the first time I really understood that religion was not a cathedral inherited from the past, or a quick prayer at the last minute. To be effective, a religion has to be backed up by discipline and effort.  von Braun 74   229230 On the motives behind this conversion, Michael J. Neufeld is of the opinion that he turned to religion to pacify his own conscience, 76  whereas University of Southampton scholar Kendrick Oliver said that von Braun was presumably moved by a desire to find a new direction for his life after the moral chaos of his service for the Third Reich. 77  Having concluded one bad bargain with the Devil, perhaps now he felt a need to have God securely at his side. 78  Later in life, he joined an Episcopal congregation, 75  and became increasingly religious. 79  He publicly spoke and wrote about the complementarity of science and religion , the afterlife of the soul, and his belief in God. 80  81  He stated, Through science man strives to learn more of the mysteries of creation. Through religion he seeks to know the Creator. 82  He was interviewed by the Assemblies of God pastor C. M. Ward, as stating, The farther we probe into space, the greater my faith. 83  In addition, he met privately with evangelist Billy Graham and with the pacifist leader Martin Luther King Jr. . 84  Von Braun with President Kennedy at Redstone Arsenal in 1963 Von Braun with the F-1 engines of the Saturn V first stage at the U.S. Space and Rocket Center Still with his rocket models , von Braun is pictured in his new office at NASA headquarters in 1970 Concepts for orbital warfare  edit  Von Braun developed and published his space station concept during the coldest time of the Cold War , when the U.S. government for which he worked put the containment of the Soviet Union above everything else. The fact that his space station  if armed with missiles that could be easily adapted from those already available at this time  would give the United States space superiority in both orbital and orbit-to-ground warfare did not escape him. In his popular writings, von Braun elaborated on them in several of his books and articles, but he took care to qualify such military applications as particularly dreadful. This much-less-peaceful aspect of von Brauns drive for space has been reviewed by Michael J. Neufeld from the Space History Division of the National Air and Space Museum in Washington. 85  NASA career  edit  Von Braun during the Apollo 11 launch, with binoculars to watch it The U.S. Navy had been tasked with building a rocket to lift satellites into orbit, but the resulting Vanguard rocket launch system was unreliable. In 1957, with the launch of Sputnik 1 , a growing belief within the United States existed that it was lagging behind the Soviet Union in the emerging Space Race . American authorities then chose to use von Braun and his German teams experience with missiles to create an orbital launch vehicle. Von Braun had originally proposed such an idea in 1954, but it was denied at the time. 60  NASA was established by law on July 29, 1958. One day later, the 50th Redstone rocket was successfully launched from Johnston Atoll in the south Pacific as part of Operation Hardtack I . Two years later, NASA opened the Marshall Space Flight Center at Redstone Arsenal in Huntsville, and the Army Ballistic Missile Agency ABMA development team led by von Braun was transferred to NASA. In a face-to-face meeting with Herb York at the Pentagon, von Braun made it clear he would go to NASA only if development of the Saturn were allowed to continue. 86  Von Braun became the centers first director on 1 July 1960 and held the position until 27 January 1970. 87  Von Brauns early years at NASA included a failed  four-inch flight  during which the first uncrewed Mercury-Redstone rocket only rose a few inches before settling back onto the launch pad. The launch failure was later determined to be the result of a power plug with one prong shorter than the other because a worker filed it to make it fit. Because of the difference in the length of one prong, the launch system detected the difference in the power disconnection as a cut-off signal to the engine. The system stopped the launch, and the incident created a nadir of morale in Project Mercury.  citation needed  After the flight of Mercury-Redstone 2 in January 1961 experienced a string of problems, von Braun insisted on one more test before the Redstone could be deemed man-rated. His overly cautious nature brought about clashes with other people involved in the program, who argued that MR-2s technical issues were simple and had been resolved shortly after the flight. He overruled them, so a test mission involving a Redstone on a boilerplate capsule was flown successfully in March. Von Brauns stubbornness was blamed for the inability of the U.S. to launch a crewed space mission before the Soviet Union, which ended up putting the first man in space the following month.  citation needed  Charles W. Mathews, von Braun, George Mueller , and Lt. Gen. Samuel C. Phillips in the Launch Control Center following the successful Apollo 11 liftoff on July 16, 1969 The Marshall Centers first major program was the development of Saturn rockets to carry heavy payloads into and beyond Earth orbit . From this, the Apollo program for crewed Moon flights was developed. Von Braun initially pushed for a flight engineering concept that called for an Earth orbit rendezvous technique the approach he had argued for building his space station, but in 1962, he converted to the lunar orbit rendezvous concept that was subsequently realized. 88  During Apollo, he worked closely with former Peenemnde teammate, Kurt H. Debus , the first director of the Kennedy Space Center. His dream to help mankind set foot on the Moon became a reality on July 16, 1969, when a Marshall-developed Saturn V rocket launched the crew of Apollo 11 on its historic eight-day mission. Over the course of the program, Saturn V rockets enabled six teams of astronauts to reach the surface of the Moon. During the late 1960s, von Braun was instrumental in the development of the U.S. Space and Rocket Center in Huntsville. The desk from which he guided Americas entry in the space race remains on display there. He also was instrumental in the launching of the experimental Applications Technology Satellite . He traveled to India and hoped that the program would be helpful for bringing a massive educational television project to help the poorest people in that country. 89  90  During the local summer of 196667, von Braun participated in a field trip to Antarctica , organized for him and several other members of top NASA management. 91  The goal of the field trip was to determine whether the experience gained by U.S. scientific and technological community during the exploration of Antarctic wastelands would be useful for the crewed exploration of space. Von Braun was mainly interested in management of the scientific effort on Antarctic research stations, logistics, habitation, and life support, and in using the barren Antarctic terrain like the glacial dry valleys to test the equipment that one day would be used to look for signs of life on Mars and other worlds. In an internal memo dated January 16, 1969, 92  von Braun had confirmed to his staff that he would stay on as a center director at Huntsville to head the Apollo Applications Program . He referred to this time as a moment in his life when he felt the strong need to pray, stating I certainly prayed a lot before and during the crucial Apollo flights. 93  A few months later, on occasion of the first Moon landing, he publicly expressed his optimism that the Saturn V carrier system would continue to be developed, advocating human missions to Mars in the 1980s. 94  Nonetheless, on March 1, 1970, von Braun and his family relocated to Washington, DC, when he was assigned the post of NASAs Deputy Associate Administrator for Planning at NASA Headquarters. After a series of conflicts associated with the truncation of the Apollo program, and facing severe budget constraints, von Braun retired from NASA on May 26, 1972. Not only had it become evident by this time that NASA and his visions for future U.S. space flight projects were incompatible, but also it was perhaps even more frustrating for him to see popular support for a continued presence of man in space wane dramatically once the goal to reach the Moon had been accomplished. Von Braun and William R. Lucas , the first and third Marshall Space Flight Center directors, viewing a Spacelab model in 1974 Von Braun also developed the idea of a Space Camp that would train children in fields of science and space technologies, as well as help their mental development much the same way sports camps aim at improving physical development. 22   354355 Career after NASA  edit  After leaving NASA, von Braun became Vice President for Engineering and Development at the aerospace company Fairchild Industries in Germantown , Maryland, on July 1, 1972. In 1973, during a routine physical examination, von Braun was diagnosed with kidney cancer , which could not be controlled with the medical techniques available at the time. 95  Von Braun continued his work to the extent possible, which included accepting invitations to speak at colleges and universities, as he was eager to cultivate interest in human spaceflight and rocketry, particularly his desire to encourage the next generation of aerospace engineers. Von Braun helped establish and promote the National Space Institute , a precursor of the present-day National Space Society , in 1975, and became its first president and chairman. In 1976, he became scientific consultant to Lutz Kayser , the CEO of OTRAG , and a member of the Daimler-Benz board of directors. However, his deteriorating health forced him to retire from Fairchild on December 31, 1976. When the 1975 National Medal of Science was awarded to him in early 1977, he was hospitalized, and unable to attend the White House ceremony. Engineering philosophy  edit  Von Brauns insistence on further tests after Mercury-Redstone 2 flew higher than planned has been identified as contributing to the Soviet Unions success in launching the first human in space. 96  The Mercury-Redstone BD flight was successful, but took up the launch slot that could have put Alan Shepard into space three weeks ahead of Yuri Gagarin . His Soviet counterpart Sergei Korolev insisted on two successful flights with dogs before risking Gagarins life on a crewed attempt. The second test flight took place one day after the Mercury-Redstone BD mission. 22  Von Braun took a very conservative approach to engineering, designing with ample safety factors and redundant structure . This became a point of contention with other engineers, who struggled to keep vehicle weight down so that payload could be maximized. As noted above, his excessive caution likely led to the U.S. losing the race to put a man into space with the Soviets. Krafft Ehricke likened von Brauns approach to building the Brooklyn Bridge . 97   208 Many at NASA headquarters jokingly referred to Marshall as the  Chicago Bridge and Iron Works , but acknowledged that the designs worked. 98  The conservative approach paid off when a fifth engine was added to the Saturn C-4 , producing the Saturn V . The C-4 design had a large crossbeam that could easily absorb the thrust of an additional engine. 22   371 Personal life  edit  Maria von Braun, wife of Wernher von Braun Von Braun had a charismatic personality and was known as a ladies man. As a student in Berlin, he would often be seen in the evenings in the company of two girlfriends at once. 22   63 He later had a succession of affairs within the secretarial and computer pool at Peenemnde. 22   9294 In January 1943, von Braun became engaged to Dorothee Brill, a physical education teacher in Berlin, and he sought permission to marry from the SS Race and Settlement Office . However, the engagement was broken due to his mothers opposition. 22   146147 He had an affair in Paris with a French woman later in 1943, while preparing V-2 launch sites in northeastern France. She was imprisoned for collaboration after the war and became destitute. 22   147148 During his stay at Fort Bliss, von Braun proposed marriage to Maria Luise von Quistorp born  1928-06-10  June 10, 1928, his maternal first cousin, in a letter to his father. He married her in a Lutheran church in Landshut , Germany on March 1, 1947, having received permission to go back to Germany and return with his bride. Shortly after, he became an evangelical Christian. He returned to New York on March 26, 1947 with his wife, father, and mother. On December 9, 1948, the von Brauns first daughter Iris Careen was born at Fort Bliss Army Hospital. 65  The couple had two more children Margrit Ccile in 1952, and Peter Constantine in 1960. On April 15, 1955, von Braun became a naturalized citizen of the United States. Death  edit  Grave of Wernher von Braun in Ivy Hill Cemetery Alexandria, Virginia, 2008. Von Braun died on June 16, 1977 of pancreatic cancer in Alexandria, Virginia at age 65. 99  100  He was buried at the Ivy Hill Cemetery . His gravestone quotes Psalm 191 The heavens declare the glory of God and the firmament sheweth his handywork. KJV 101  Recognition and critique  edit  In 1970, Huntsville , Alabama honored von Brauns years of service with a series of events including the unveiling of a plaque in his honor. Pictured lr, his daughter Iris, wife Maria , U.S. Sen. John Sparkman , Alabama Gov. Albert Brewer , von Braun, son Peter, and daughter Margrit. Apollo program director Sam Phillips was quoted as saying that he did not think that the United States would have reached the Moon as quickly as it did without von Brauns help. Later, after discussing it with colleagues, he amended this to say that he did not believe the United States would have reached the Moon at all. 13   167 The von Braun crater on the Moon is named after him. Von Braun received a total of 12 honorary doctorates among them, on January 8, 1963, one from the Technical University of Berlin , from which he had graduated. Von Braun was elected to the National Academy of Engineering in 1967. In Huntsville , Alabama  Von Braun was responsible for the creation of the Research Institute at the University of Alabama in Huntsville . As a result of his vision, the university is one of the leading universities in the nation for NASA-sponsored research. The building housing the universitys Research Institute was named in his honor, Von Braun Research Hall, in 2000. The Von Braun Center built in 1975 in Huntsville is named in von Brauns honor. The Von Braun Astronomical Society in Huntsville was founded as the Rocket City Astronomical Association by von Braun and was later renamed after him. Several German cities  Bonn , Neu-Isenburg , Mannheim , Mainz , and dozens of smaller towns have streets named after von Braun. Scrutiny of von Brauns use of forced labor at Mittelwerk intensified again in 1984 when Arthur Rudolph , one of his top affiliates from the A-4V2 through the Apollo projects, left the United States and was forced to renounce his citizenship in place of the alternative of being tried for war crimes. 5  102  A science- and engineering-oriented Gymnasium in Friedberg, Bavaria was named after von Braun in 1979. In response to rising criticism, a school committee decided in 1995, after lengthy deliberations, to keep the name but to address von Brauns ambiguity in the advanced history classes. In 2012, Nazi concentration camp survivor David Salz gave a speech in Friedberg, calling out to the public to Do everything to make this name disappear from this school. 103  104  In February 2014, the school was finally renamed Staatliches Gymnasium Friedberg and distanced itself from the name von Braun, citing he was no role-model for our pupils. An avenue in the Annadale section of Staten Island , New York was named after him in 1977. Von Braun was voted into the U.S. Space and Rocket Center Hall of Fame in 2007. Summary of SS career  edit  SS number 185,068 Nazi Party number 5,738,692 22   96 Dates of rank  edit  SS- Anwrter  November 1, 1933  Candidate received rank upon joining SS Riding School  SS- Mann  July 1934 Private  left SS after graduation from the school commissioned in 1940 with date of entry backdated to 1934  SS- Untersturmfhrer  May 1, 1940 Second Lieutenant SS- Obersturmfhrer  November 9, 1941 First Lieutenant SS- Hauptsturmfhrer  November 9, 1942 Captain SS- Sturmbannfhrer  June 28, 1943 Major 29  Honors  edit  War Merit Cross , First Class with Swords in 1943 Knights Cross of the War Merit Cross in 1944 Elected Honorary Fellow of the British Interplanetary Society in 1949 105  Commanders Cross of the Order of Merit of the Federal Republic of Germany in 1959 Elliott Cresson Medal in 1962 106  Inducted into the International Aerospace Hall of Fame in 1965 107  Langley Gold Medal in 1967 108  NASA Distinguished Service Medal in 1969 Inducted into the International Space Hall of Fame in 1969 Wilhelm Exner Medal in 1969. 2  National Medal of Science in 1975 Werner von Siemens Ring in 1975 Civitan International World Citizenship Award in 1970 109  National Aviation Hall of Fame 1982 110  In popular culture  edit  This article needs additional citations for verification . Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources . Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. Find sources   Wernher von Braun     news    newspapers    books    scholar    JSTOR  April 2017   Learn how and when to remove this template message  Film and television Von Braun has been featured in a number of films and television shows or series  Man in Space  and  Man and the Moon , episodes of Disneyland which originally aired on March 9, 1955 and December 28, 1955, respectively. I Aim at the Stars 1960, also titled Wernher von Braun and Ich greife nach den Sternen I Reach for the Stars von Braun played by Curd Jrgens , his wife Maria played by Victoria Shaw . 111  Although it was said that satirist Mort Sahl suggested the subtitle But Sometimes I Hit London, the line appears in the film itself, spoken by actor James Daly who plays the cynical American press officer. Frozen Flashes 1967 based on Julius Mader s documentary report The Secret of Huntsville von Braun only referred to as the rocket baron played by Dietrich Krner    de  . Perfumed Nightmare 1977 in this Filipino film, Von Braun is repeatedly mentioned by the main character Kidlat, played by director Kidlat Tahimik . Kidlat the characters dreams of spaceflight and going to the United States is mostly due to Von Braun, and Kidlat is the chairman of his villages own Wernher von Braun fan club in Laguna , Philippines . From the Earth to the Moon TV, 1998 von Braun played by Norbert Weisser . October Sky 1999 this film portrays U.S. rocket scientist Homer Hickam , who as a teenager admired von Braun played by Joe Digaetano. The films title, October Sky , is an anagram of the autobiography it was based on Rocket Boys . Space Race TV, BBC co-production with NDR Germany, Channel One TV Russia and National Geographic TV USA, 2005 von Braun played by Richard Dillane . The Lost Von Braun , a documentary by Aron Ranen. Interviews with Ernst Stuhlinger, Konrad Dannenberg, Karl Sendler, Alex Baum, Eli Rosenbaum DOJ and von Brauns NASA secretary Bonnie Holmes. Wernher von Braun  Rocket Man for War and Peace A three part  part1 , part 2 , part 3  documentary  in English  from the German International channel DW-TV . 112  Original German version Wernher von Braun  Der Mann fr die Wunderwaffen by the Mitteldeutscher Rundfunk. Played by Ludwig Blochberger . 113  Timeless television series 2016 Party at Castle Varlar season 1, episode 4 von Braun played by Christian Oliver . Project Blue Book television series 2019 Operation Paperclip Season 1, episode 4 von Braun played by Thomas Kretschmann . Several fictional characters have been modeled on von Braun Dr. Strangelove, or How I Learned to Stop Worrying and Love the Bomb 1964 Dr Strangelove is usually held to be based at least partly on von Braun. 114  In print media In Warren Ellis s graphic novel Ministry of Space , von Braun is a supporting character, settling in Britain after World War II, and being essential for the realization of the British space program. In Jonathan Hickman s comic book series The Manhattan Projects , von Braun is a major character. In literature The Good German by Joseph Kanon. Von Braun and other scientists are said to have been implicated in the use of slave labor at Peenemnde their transfer to the U.S. forms part of the narrative. Space by James Michener . Von Braun and other German scientists are brought to the U.S. and form a vital part of the U.S. efforts to reach space. Gravitys Rainbow by Thomas Pynchon. The novel involves British intelligence attempting to avert and predict V-2 rocket attacks. The work even includes a gyroscopic equation for the V2. The first portion of the novel, Beyond The Zero, begins with a quotation from von Braun Nature does not know extinction all it knows is transformation. Everything science has taught me, and continues to teach me, strengthens my belief in the continuity of our spiritual existence after death. V-S Day by Allen Steele is a 2014 alternate history novel in which the space race occurs during World War II between teams led by Robert H. Goddard and von Braun. Moonglow by Michael Chabon 2016 includes a fictionalized description of the search for and capture of Von Braun by the US Army, and his role in the Nazi V-2 program and subsequently in the US space program. In theatre Rocket City, Alabam, a stage play by Mark Saltzman , weaves von Brauns real life with a fictional plot in which a young Jewish woman in Huntsville, Alabama becomes aware of his Nazi past and tries to inspire awareness and outrage. Von Braun is a character in the play. 115  In music Infinite Journey 1962, Johann Sebastian Bach and Apollo program rocket sounds album by various artists including Henry Mazer , which features von Braun as a narrator. 116  Wernher von Braun 1965 117  A song written and performed by Tom Lehrer for an episode of NBC s American version of the BBC TV show That Was The Week That Was  the song was later included in Lehrers albums That Was The Year That Was and The Remains of Tom Lehrer . It was a satire on what some saw as von Brauns cavalier attitude toward the consequences of his work in Nazi Germany. 118  The Last Days of Pompeii 1991 A rock opera by Grant Hart s post- Hsker D alternative rock group Nova Mob , in which von Braun features as a character. The album includes a song called Wernher von Braun. Published works  edit  Proposal for a Workable Fighter with Rocket Drive . July 6, 1939. .mw-parser-output cite.citationfont-styleinherit.mw-parser-output .citation qquotes.mw-parser-output .citation .cs1-lock-free abackgroundurlupload.wikimedia.orgwikipediacommonsthumb665Lock-green.svg9px-Lock-green.svg.pngno-repeatbackground-positionright .1em center.mw-parser-output .citation .cs1-lock-limited a,.mw-parser-output .citation .cs1-lock-registration abackgroundurlupload.wikimedia.orgwikipediacommonsthumbdd6Lock-gray-alt-2.svg9px-Lock-gray-alt-2.svg.pngno-repeatbackground-positionright .1em center.mw-parser-output .citation .cs1-lock-subscription abackgroundurlupload.wikimedia.orgwikipediacommonsthumbaaaLock-red-alt-2.svg9px-Lock-red-alt-2.svg.pngno-repeatbackground-positionright .1em ce nter.mw-parser-output .cs1-subscription,.mw-parser-output .cs1-registrationcolor555.mw-parser-output .cs1-subscription span,.mw-parser-output .cs1-registration spanborder-bottom1px dottedcursorhelp.mw-parser-output .cs1-ws-icon abackgroundurlupload.wikimedia.orgwikipediacommonsthumb44cWikisource-logo.svg12px-Wikisource-logo.svg.pngno-repeatbackground-positionright .1em center.mw-parser-output code.cs1-codecolorinheritbackgroundinheritborderinheritpaddinginherit.mw-parser-output .cs1-hidden-errordisplaynonefont-size100.mw-parser-output .cs1-visible-errorfont-size100.mw-parser-output .cs1-maintdisplaynonecolor33aa33margin-left0.3em.mw-parser-output .cs1-subscription,.mw-parser-output .cs1-registration,.mw-parser-outpu t .cs1-formatfont-size95.mw-parser-output .cs1-kern-left,.mw-parser-output .cs1-kern-wl-leftpadding-left0.2em.mw-parser-output .cs1-kern-right,.mw-parser-output .cs1-kern-wl-rightpadding-right0.2em The proposed vertical take-off interceptor 119  for climbing to 35,000  ft in 60 seconds was rejected by the Luftwaffe in the autumn of 1941 38   258 for the Messerschmitt Me 163 Komet 22   151 and never produced. The differing Bachem Ba 349 was produced during the 1944 Emergency Fighter Program . Survey of Previous Liquid Rocket Development in Germany and Future Prospects . May 1945. 120  A Minimum Satellite Vehicle Based on Components Available from Developments of the Army Ordnance Corps . September 15, 1954. It would be a blow to U.S. prestige if we did not launch a satellite first. 120  The Mars Project , Urbana, University of Illinois Press, 1953. With Henry J. White, translator. Arthur C. Clarke , ed. 1967. German Rocketry, The Coming of the Space Age . New York Meredith Press. First Men to the Moon , Holt, Rinehart and Winston, New York 1958. Portions of work first appeared in This Week Magazine. Daily Journals of Wernher von Braun, May 1958  March 1970 . March 1970. 120  History of Rocketry  Space Travel , New York, Crowell 1975. With Frederick I. Ordway III. Estate of Wernher von Braun Ordway III, Frederick I  Dooling, David Jr. 1985 1975. Space Travel A History 2nd ed.. New York Harper  Row. ISBN   978-0-06-181898-1 . The Rockets Red Glare , Garden City, N.Y. Anchor Press, 1976. With Frederick I. Ordway III. Project Mars A Technical Tale , Apogee Books, Toronto 2006. A previously unpublished science fiction story by von Braun. Accompanied by paintings from Chesley Bonestell and von Brauns own technical papers on the proposed project. The Voice of Dr. Wernher von Braun , Apogee Books, Toronto 2007. A collection of speeches delivered by von Braun over the course of his career. See also  edit  Biography portal Physics portal Spaceflight portal World War II portal Robert Esnault-Pelterie German inventors and discoverers List of coupled cousins Pedro Paulet Konstantin Tsiolkovsky References  edit   Ivy Hill Cemetery, Alexandria, VA., Wilson, Scott. Resting Places The Burial Sites of More Than 14,000 Famous Persons, 3d ed. 2 Kindle Location 48952. McFarland  Company, Inc., Publishers. Kindle Edition.  a b Editor, GV. 2015. Wilhelm Exner Medal. Austrian Trade Association. GV. Austria.  Neufeld, Michael. Von Braun Dreamer of Space, Engineer of War First ed.. Vintage Books. pp.  xv. Although Wernher von Braun got a doctorate in physics in 1934, he never worked a day in his life thereafter as a scientist. He was an engineer and a manager of engineers, and he used that vocabulary when he was talking to his professional peers.  Wernher von Braun Historys Most Controversial Figure , Al Jazeera  a b c d e f Neufeld, Michael J. May 20, 2019. Wernher von Braun and the Nazis . American Experience Chasing the Moon . PBS . Retrieved July 24, 2019 .  SP-4206 Stages to Saturn, Chapter 9 . history.nasa.gov . Retrieved March 8, 2015 .  Biography of Wernher von Braun . MSFC History Office . NASA Marshall Space Flight Center.  Von Braun, Wernher Archived July 19, 2011, at the Wayback Machine , Erratik Institut. Retrieved 4 February 2011  Dr. Wernher von Brauni mlestuseks , Fsikainstituut. Retrieved 4 February 2011  a b Spires, Shelby G. June 27, 2003. Von Brauns brother dies aided surrender. The Huntsville Times . p.  1A. Magnus von Braun, the brother of rocket pioneer Wernher von Braun who worked in Huntsville from 19501955, died Saturday in Phoenix, Ariz. He was 84. Though not as famous as his older brother, who died in 1977, Magnus von Braun made the first contact with U.S. Army troops to arrange the German rocket teams surrender at the end of World War II.  Magnus Freiherr von Braun, Von Ostpreuen bis Texas. Erlebnisse und zeitgeschichtliche Betrachtungen eines Ostdeutschen . Stollhamm 1955  a b Recollections of Childhood Early Experiences in Rocketry as Told by Werner von Braun 1963 . MSFC History Office . NASA Marshall Space Flight Center.  a b c d e f g Ward, Bob 2005. Dr. Space The Life of Wernher von Braun . ISBN   978-1-591-14926-2 .  OCLC   6026491  Various sources such as The Nazi Rocketeers  ISBN   0811733874 pp 58 list the young Wernher von Braun as joining the VfR as an apprentice to Willy Ley, one of the three founders. Later when Ley fled Germany because he was a Jew, von Braun took over the leadership of the Verein and changed its activity to military development.  Wernher von Braun biography . Biography.com . Retrieved March 1, 2014 .  Early Experiences in Rocketry as Told by Werner von Braun 1963 . History.msfc.nasa.gov . Retrieved August 15, 2013 .  httpshistory.msfc.nasa.govvonbraunrecollect-childhood.html  As related by Augustes son Jacques Piccard to fellow deep-sea explorer Hans Fricke, cited in Fricke H. Der Fisch, der aus der Urzeit kam , pp. 2324. Deutscher Taschenbuch-Verlag, 2010. ISBN   978-3-423-34616-0 in German  Leo Nutz Elmar Wild December 28, 1989. Oberth-museum.org . Oberth-museum.org . Retrieved August 15, 2013 .  Davies, Norman 2006. Europe at War 19391945 No Simple Victory . London Macmillan . p.  416. ISBN   9780333692851 . OCLC   70401618 .  a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o Neufeld, Michael 2007. Von Braun Dreamer of Space Engineer of War . New York Alfred A. Knopf. ISBN   978-0-307-26292-9 .  Spangenburg  Moser. 2009. Wernher von Braun, Revised Edition . Infobase Publishing. p. 33  See Ward 2005, Chapter 5 Encounters with Hitler.  Ward, Bob 2009. Dr. Space The Life of Wernher von Braun . US Naval Institute Press. ISBN   978-1591149279 .  Wernher von Braun FBI file .  Dr. Space pp. 35 It had been thought that he publicly wore his uniform with swastika armband just once, during one of two formal...  Dr. Space, p. 35. Wernher von Braun in SS uniform . The Reformation Online .  a b von Braun . Astronautix.com. Archived from the original on August 17, 2013. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Konstruktive, theoretische und experimentelle Beitrge zu dem Problem der Flssigkeitsrakete. Raketentechnik und Raumfahrtforschung , Sonderheft 1 1960, Stuttgart, Germany.  Weisstein, Eric Wolfgang ed.. Robert Goddard . ScienceWorld .  The Man Who Opened the Door to Space . Popular Science . May 1959.  Neufeld, Michael J. 2008. Wernher von Braun Dreamer of Space, Engineer of War . Vintage. p. 351  a b c d Dr. Space The Life of Wernher von Braun , Bob Ward. Naval Institute Press, Jul 10, 2013. Retrieved 6 mar 2017  Speer, Albert 1969. Erinnerungen , p. 377. Verlag Ullstein GmbH, Frankfurt a.M. and Berlin, ISBN   3-550-06074-2 .  Peenemnde, 17 and 18 August 1943 . RAF History  Bomber Command . Royal Air Force. Archived from the original on November 1, 2006 . Retrieved November 15, 2006 . Cite uses deprecated parameter dead-url  help   Middlebrook, Martin 1982. The Peenemnde Raid The Night of 1718 August 1943 . New York Bobs-Merrill. p.  222. ISBN   978-0-672-52759-3 .  a b Dornberger, Walter 1952. V2Der Schuss ins Weltall . Esslingan Bechtle Verlag US translation V-2 Viking PressNew York, 1954. p.  164. Italic or bold markup not allowed in publisher  help   Neufeld, Michael J. 2008. Wernher von Braun Dreamer of Space, Engineer of War. Vintage. p. 184  Morrow, Lance August 3, 1998. The Moon and the Clones . Time . Retrieved August 30, 2009 .  a b c d e Warsitz, Lutz 2009. The First Jet Pilot The Story of German Test Pilot Erich Warsitz . Pen and Sword Books Ltd. ISBN   978-1-84415-818-8 .  Tracy Dungan. Mittelbau Overview . V2rocket.com . Retrieved August 15, 2013 .  Excerpts from Power to Explore   . MSFC History Office . NASA Marshall Space Flight Center.  Jaroff, Leon March 26, 2002. The Rocket Mans Dark Side . Time . Archived from the original on May 27, 2012. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   a b Biddle, Wayne 2009. Dark Side of the Moon Wernher von Braun, the Third Reich, and the Space Race . W. W. Norton  Company. ISBN   9780393072648 .  124125  Michael J. Neufeld Feb., 2002 Wernher von Braun, the SS, and Concentration Camp Labor Questions of Moral, Political, and Criminal Responsibility , German Studies Review , Vol. 25, No. 1, pp. 5778  Fiedermann, He, and Jaeger 1993 Das KZ Mittelbau Dora. Ein historischer Abriss , p. 100, Westkreuz Verlag, Berlin ISBN   978-3-92213-194-6  Ernst Stuhlinger Frederick Ira Ordway April 1994. Wernher von Braun, crusader for space a biographical memoir . Krieger Pub. p.  42. ISBN   978-0-89464-842-7 . Retrieved December 18, 2011 .  Sellier, Andr 2003. A History of the Dora Camp The Untold Story of the Nazi Slave Labor Camp That Secretly Manufactured V-2 Rockets . Chicago, IL Ivan R Dee. ISBN   978-1-56663-511-0 .  Highlights in German Rocket Development from 19271945 . MSFC History Office . NASA Marshall Space Flight Center.  Ward, Bob. 2013. Dr. Space The Life of Wernher von Braun . Naval Institute Press. Ch. 5  Speer, Albert 1995. Inside the Third Reich . London Weidenfeld  Nicolson. pp.  501502. ISBN   9781842127353 .  a b c Cadbury, Deborah 2005. Space Race . BBC Worldwide Limited . ISBN   978-0-00-721299-6 .  Archived copy . Archived from the original on April 28, 2015. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help  CS1 maint archived copy as title  link  Capture of Werner von Braun by the 324th Regiment Anti-tank Company  McDougall, Walter A. 1985. ...The Heavens and the Earth A Political History of the Space Age . New York Basic Books. p.   44 . ISBN   978-0-465-02887-0 .  Arts  Entertainment, Biography 19591961 series. Mike Wallace, television biography of Wernher von Braun, video clip of the press statement.  McGovern, J 1964. Crossbow and Overcast . New York W. Morrow. p.  182.  Speer, Albert 2001. Schlie, Ulrich ed.. Alles, was ich wei . F.A. Herbig Verlagsbuchhandlung. p.  12. ISBN   978-3-7766-2092-4 .  Outstanding German Scientists Being Brought to U.S . War Department press release . V2Rocket.com. October 1, 1945. Archived from the original on March 1, 2010. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   a b c d e f g h Matthew Brzezinski 2007 Red Moon Rising Sputnik and the Hidden Rivalries That Ignited the Space Age , pp. 8492, Henry Holt, New York ISBN   978-0-80508-147-3  Neufeld, Michael J. 2008. Von Braun   dreamer of space, engineer of war First ed.. New York Vintage Books. p.  218. ISBN   9780525435914 . OCLC   982248820 .  Wernher von Braun  Encyclopedia of Alabama . Encyclopedia of Alabama . Retrieved March 27, 2016 .  REDSTONE ROCKET, HARDTACK-TEAK TEST, AUGUST 1958 . YouTube . October 3, 2011.  Bucher, G. C. Mc Call, J. C. Ordway, F. I., III Stuhlinger, E. From Peenemuende to Outer Space. Commemorating the Fiftieth Birthday of Wernher von Braun. NASA Technical Reports Server . hdl  206019630006100 . CS1 maint multiple names authors list  link   a b Reach for the Stars . TIME Magazine . February 17, 1958.  a b Woodfill, Jerry November 30, 2004. Gallery of Wernher von Braun Moonship Sketches . The Space Educators Handbook . NASA Johnson Space Center. Archived from the original on May 30, 2010. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Bergaust, Erik 1976. Wernher von Braun The authoritative and definitive biographical profile of the father of modern space flight Hardcover . National Space Institute. ISBN   978-0-917680-01-4 .  Wernher von Braun 2006 Project Mars   a technical tale , Apogee Books, Burlington, Ontario ISBN   978-0-97382-033-1  Ley, Willy October 1955. For Your Information . Galaxy . p.  60 . Retrieved December 16, 2013 .  Pat Williams, Jim Denney 2004 How to Be Like Walt Capturing the Disney Magic Every Day of Your Life , p. 237, Health Communications Inc. ISBN   978-0-75730-231-2  Wernher von Braun January 2000  First Men to the Moon . Reprint by Henry Holt  Co., Inc. ISBN   978-0-03030-295-4  Neufeld, Michael J. 2008 Wernher von Braun Dreamer of Space, Engineer of War , Vintage. p. 4 230  Stuhlinger, Ernst  Ira Ordway, Frederick. 1994. Wernher von Braun, crusader for space a biographical memoir . Krieger Pub, p. 270  a b Neufeld, Michael J. 2007 Wernher von Braun Dreamer of Space, Engineer of War , Knoff, NY ISBN   978-0-30726-292-9  a b Mallon, Thomas Oct. 22, 2007 Rocket Man , The New Yorker , Access date January 8, 2015.  Walker, Mark 2008 A 20th-Century Faust Archived April 2, 2015, at the Wayback Machine , American Scientist , Access January 8, 2015  Oliver, Kendrick 2012 To Touch the Face of God The Sacred, the Profane, and the American Space Program, 19571975 , p. 23, Johns Hopkins University Press ISBN   978-1-42140-788-3  Oliver, 2012, p. 24  Stuhlinger, Ernst  Ira Ordway, Frederick. 1994. Wernher von Braun, crusader for space a biographical memoir . Krieger Pub, p. 270 Those who knew him through the 1960s and 1970s noticed during these years that a new element began to surface in his conversations, and also in his speeches and his writings a growing interest in religious thought.  von Braun, Wernher 1963 My Faith A Space-Age Scientist Tells Why He Must Believe in God, February 10, 1963 The American Weekly , p. 2, New York The Hearst Corporation.  See von Brauns speeches in The voice of Dr. Wernher Von Brain An Anthology . Apogee Books Publication ed. by Irene E. Powell-Willhite These touch a variety of topics, including education, the cold war, religion, and the space program.  See the same article by von Braun, Wernher, published as Science and religion, in Rome Daily American , September 13, 1966. Available in New Age Frontiersn Oct. 1966 United Family , Vol- II, No. 10.  See The Farther We Probe into Space, the Greater my Faith C.M.Wards account of His Interview with Dr. Warner von Braun 1966 Springfield, MO Assemblies of God, 17 pp. Mini-pamphlet.  Ward, Bob 2013 Dr. Space The Life of Wernher von Braun , Ch. 1 The Accursed Blessing, Naval Institute Press OCLC   857079205  Neufeld MJ Space superiority Wernher von Brauns campaign for a nuclear-armed space station, 19461956. Space Policy 2006 225262.  Stages to Saturn  The Saturn Building Blocks  THE ABMA TRANSFER . NASA.  Photos Wernher von Braun, Space Pioneer Remembered . Space.com . 2012 . Retrieved February 15, 2019 .  Concluding Remarks by Dr. Wernher von Braun about Mode Selection for the Lunar Landing Program PDF . Lunar Orbit Rendezvous File . NASA Historical Reference Collection. June 7, 1962.  Spangenburg  Moser. 2009. Wernher von Braun, Revised Edition. Infobase Publishing. p. 129-130  See Dr. Wernher von Braun talks about ATSF satellite project  Space Mans Look at Antarctica. Popular Science , Vol. 190, No. 5, May 1967, pp. 114116.  von Braun, Wernher January 16, 1969. Adjustment to Marshall Organization, Announcement No. 4 PDF . MSFC History Office . NASA Marshall Space Flight Center. Archived from the original PDF on June 21, 2007. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Bergaust, Erik. 1976. Wernher von Braun The Authoritative and Definitive Biographical Profile of the Father of Modern Space Flight . National Space Institute. p. 117  Next, Mars and Beyond . Time . July 25, 1969 . Retrieved June 21, 2007 . Even as man prepared to take his first tentative extraterrestrial steps, other celestial adventures beckoned him. The shape and scope of the post-Apollo crewed space program remained hazy, and a great deal depends on the safe and successful outcome of Apollo 11 . Well before the lunar flight was launched, though, NASA was casting eyes on targets far beyond the Moon. The most inviting the earths close, and probably most hospitable, planetary neighbor. Given the same energy and dedication that took them to the Moon, says Wernher von Braun, Americans could land on Mars as early as 1982.  German sources mostly specify the cancer as renal, while American biographies unanimously just mention cancer. The time when von Braun learned about the disease is generally given as between 1973 and 1976. The characteristics of renal cell carcinoma, which has a bad prognosis even today, do not rule out either time limit.  Launius, Roger 2002. To Reach the Higher Frontier A History of U.S. Launch Vehicles . University of Kentucky. ISBN   978-0-8131-2245-8 .  Sloop, John L. 1978. Liquid hydrogen as a propulsion fuel, 19451959 PDF . The NASA history series. SP-4404.  To the Moon . NOVA . July 13, 1999.  Von Braun, Who Helped Put Men on Moon, Dies at 65 German-Born Scientist Succumbs to Pancreatic Cancer Was Pioneer in Space Rocket Technology. Los Angeles Times . June 17, 1977. p.  A2.  Wernher von Braun, Rocket Pioneer, Dies Wernher von Braun, Pioneer in Space Travel and Rocketry, Dies at 65. New York Times . June 18, 1977. Wernher von Braun, the master rocket builder and pioneer of space travel, died of cancer Thursday morning. He was 65 years old.  Psalm 191 . Bible Gateway .  Winterstein, William E., Sr. March 1, 2005. Secrets Of The Space Age . Robert D. Reed Publishers. ISBN   978-1-931741-49-1 .  Rother, Marcel March 22, 2012. Gymnasium Friedberg Ein Ort, der das Herz zittern lsst Friedberg Gymnasium A place that can make the heart tremble . Augsburger Allgemeine in German. Augsburg Presse-Druck- und Verlags-GmbH . Retrieved December 1, 2015 .  Mayr, Stefan March 23, 2012. Streit um Wernher-von-Braun-Gymnasium Tut alles, damit dieser Name verschwindet   Dispute over the Wernher von Braun Gymnasium Do everything to make this name disappear . Sddeutschen Zeitung in German. Munich Sddeutsche Zeitung GmbH . Retrieved December 1, 2015 .  Prof Dr Wernher von Braun. Journal of the British Interplanetary Society . 9 2. March 1950.  Astronautical and Aeronautical Events of 1962  Report of the National Aeronautics and Space Administration to the Committee on Science and Astronautics, U.S. House of Representatives PDF , U.S. Government Printing Office, June 12, 1963, p.  217 , retrieved July 14, 2014  Sprekelmeyer, Linda, editor. These We Honor The International Aerospace Hall of Fame . Donning Co. Publishers, 2006.  Dr von Braun Honoured PDF . Flight International . Iliffe Transport Publications. July 22, 1967. p.  1030 . Retrieved April 16, 2009 .  Armbrester, Margaret E. 1992. The Civitan Story . Birmingham, AL Ebsco Media. pp.  95, 105.  Hall of Famer . Beatrice Daily Sun . Beatrice, Nebraska. Associated Press. July 26, 1982. p.  3  via Newspapers.com.  I Aim at the Stars 1960 . Turner Classic Movies . Retrieved August 10, 2010 .  DW-TV . Dw-world.de. June 25, 2011 . Retrieved August 15, 2013 .  Ortmanns, Nadine. Interview mit Schauspieler Ludwig Blochberger  kontinente . www.kontinente.org . Retrieved February 21, 2019 .  Neufield, Von Braun , p. 406. Dr Strangelove was widely held to be a composite of Edward Teller , Herman Kahn , and von Braun but only von Braun shared Strangeloves Nazi past.  MadKap Productions presents Rocket City, Alabam  . Skokie Illinois Theatre and MadKap Productions. 2017 . Retrieved November 29, 2017 . Italic or bold markup not allowed in publisher  help   Florida Symphony Orchestra And Bach Festival Choir  Journey To Infinity . Discogs . Retrieved May 21, 2017 .  Tom Lehrer December 1, 2008. Wernher von Braun . Youtube.com . Retrieved August 15, 2013 .  Stop clapping, this is serious . Sydney Morning Herald . March 1, 2003 . Retrieved October 7, 2013 .  Klee, Ernst Merk, Otto 1963. The Birth of the MissileThe Secrets of Peenemnde . Hamburg Gerhard Stalling Verlag English translation 1965. pp.  89, 95.  a b c Ordway, Frederick I, III  Sharpe, Mitchell R 1979. The Rocket Team . Apogee Books Space Series 36. New York Thomas Y. Crowell. pp.  308, 425, 509. ISBN   978-1-894959-00-1 . Further reading  edit  Biddle, Wayne 2009. Dark Side of the Moon Wernher von Braun, the Third Reich, and the Space Race . W. W. Norton. ISBN   978-0-393-05910-6 . Bilstein, Roger 2003. Stages to Saturn A Technological History of the ApolloSaturn Launch Vehicles . University Press of Florida. ISBN   978-0-813-02691-6 . Dunar, Andrew J Waring, Stephen P 1999. Power to Explore a History of Marshall Space Flight Center, 19601990 . Washington, DC United States Government Printing Office . ISBN   978-0-16-058992-8 . Freeman, Marsha 1993. How we got to the Moon The Story of the German Space Pioneers Paperback . 21st Century Science Associates October 1993. ISBN   978-0-9628134-1-2 . Lasby, Clarence G 1971. Project Paperclip German Scientists and the Cold War. New York, NY Atheneum. ASIN   B0006CKBHY . Cite journal requires journal  help  Neufeld, Michael J 1994. The Rocket and the Reich Peenemnde and the Coming of the Ballistic Missile Era . New York Free Press. ISBN   978-0-02-922895-1 . Neufeld, Michael J 2007. Von Braun Dreamer of Space, Engineer of War . New York Alfred A. Knopf . ISBN   978-0-307-26292-9 . Ordway, Frederick I., III 2003. The Rocket Team Apogee Books Space Series 36 Apogee Books Space Series Hardcover . Collectors Guide Publishing Inc. HarDVD edition September 1, 2003. ISBN   978-1-894959-00-1 . Petersen, Michael B. 2009. Missiles for the Fatherland Peenemuende, National Socialism and the V-2 missile . Cambridge Centennial of Flight. New York Cambridge University Press. ISBN   978-0-521-88270-5 . OCLC   644940362 . Stuhlinger, Ernst 1996. Wernher von Braun Crusader for Space . Malabar, FL Krieger Publishing Company. ISBN   978-0-89464-980-6 . Tompkins, Phillip K. 1993. Organizational Communication Imperatives Lessons of the Space Program . Oxford University Press. ISBN   978-0195329667 . Ward, Bob 2005. Dr. Space The Life of Wernher von Braun . Annapolis, MD, United States Naval Institute Press. ISBN   978-1-59114-927-9 . Willhite, Irene E. 2007. The Voice of Dr. Wernher von Braun An Anthology Apogee Books Space Series . Collectors Guide Publishing, Inc. ISBN   978-1894959643 . External links  edit  Wikimedia Commons has media related to Wernher von Braun . Wikiquote has quotations related to Wernher von Braun Audiopodcast on Astrotalkuk.org BBC journalist Reg Turnill talking in 2011 about his personal memories of and interviews with Dr Wernher von Braun. The capture of von Braun and his men  At the U.S. 44th Infantry Division website Wernher von Braun page  Marshall Space Flight Center MSFC History Office The Disney  von Braun Collaboration and its Influence on Space Exploration  by Mike Wright, MSFC Coat-of-arms of Dr. Wernher von Braun Remembering Von Braun  by Anthony Young  The Space Review Monday, July 10, 2006 The Mittelbau-Dora Concentration Camp Memorial V2rocket.com 60th anniversary digital reprinting of Colliers Space Series , Houston Section of the American Institute of Aeronautics and Astronautics CIA documents on Dr. Wernher von Braun on the Internet Archive FBI Records The Vault  Wernher VonBraun files at vault.fbi.gov Wernher von Braun at the Internet Speculative Fiction Database Wernher von Braun at Library of Congress Authorities, with 35 catalogue records v t e NASAs George C. Marshall Space Flight Center  Huntsville, Alabama  Directors von Braun Rees Petrone Lucas Thompson Lee Bridwell Littles Griner Stephenson King Lightfoot Goldman Henderson Scheuermann Projects Space Shuttle Propulsion International Space Station Chandra X-ray Observatory Gravity Probe B Project Constellation Ares I Ares V Orion NRHP sites Neutral Buoyancy Simulator Propulsion and Structural Test Facility Redstone Test Stand Saturn V Dynamic Test Stand Saturn V Dynamic Test Vehicle Other Operation Paperclip Von Braun Team ABMA Redstone Arsenal Redstone Rocket U.S. Space  Rocket Center  acting director only v t e Systems engineering Subfields Aerospace engineering Biological systems engineering Configuration management Earth systems engineering and management Electrical engineering Enterprise systems engineering Performance engineering Reliability engineering Safety engineering Processes Requirements engineering Functional specification System integration Verification and validation Design review Concepts Business process System System lifecycle V-Model Systems development life cycle Tools Decision-making Function modelling IDEF Optimization Quality function deployment System dynamics Systems Modeling Language Systems analysis Systems modeling Work breakdown structure People James S. Albus Ruzena Bajcsy Benjamin S. Blanchard Wernher von Braun Kathleen Carley Harold Chestnut Wolt Fabrycky Barbara Grosz Arthur David Hall III Derek Hitchins Robert E. Machol Radhika Nagpal Simon Ramo Joseph Francis Shea Katia Sycara Manuela M. Veloso John N. Warfield Related fields Control engineering Computer engineering Industrial engineering Operations research Project management Quality management Risk management Software engineering Category v t e United States National Medal of Science laureates Behavioral and social science 1960s 1964 Roger Adams Othmar H. Ammann Theodosius Dobzhansky Neal Elgar Miller 1980s 1986 Herbert A. Simon 1987 Anne Anastasi George J. Stigler 1988 Milton Friedman 1990s 1990 Leonid Hurwicz Patrick Suppes 1991 Robert W. Kates George A. Miller 1992 Eleanor J. Gibson 1994 Robert K. Merton 1995 Roger N. Shepard 1996 Paul Samuelson 1997 William K. Estes 1998 William Julius Wilson 1999 Robert M. Solow 2000s 2000 Gary Becker 2001 George Bass 2003 R. Duncan Luce 2004 Kenneth Arrow 2005 Gordon H. Bower 2008 Michael I. Posner 2009 Mortimer Mishkin 2010s 2011 Anne Treisman 2014 Robert Axelrod 2015 Albert Bandura Biological sciences 1960s 1963 C. B. van Niel 1964 Marshall W. Nirenberg 1965 Francis P. Rous George G. Simpson Donald D. Van Slyke 1966 Edward F. Knipling Fritz Albert Lipmann William C. Rose Sewall Wright 1967 Kenneth S. Cole Harry F. Harlow Michael Heidelberger Alfred H. Sturtevant 1968 Horace Barker Bernard B. Brodie Detlev W. Bronk Jay Lush Burrhus Frederic Skinner 1969 Robert Huebner Ernst Mayr 1970s 1970 Barbara McClintock Albert B. Sabin 1973 Daniel I. Arnon Earl W. Sutherland Jr. 1974 Britton Chance Erwin Chargaff James V. Neel James Augustine Shannon 1975 Hallowell Davis Paul Gyorgy Sterling B. Hendricks Orville Alvin Vogel 1976 Roger Guillemin Keith Roberts Porter Efraim Racker E. O. Wilson 1979 Robert H. Burris Elizabeth C. Crosby Arthur Kornberg Severo Ochoa Earl Reece Stadtman George Ledyard Stebbins Paul Alfred Weiss 1980s 1981 Philip Handler 1982 Seymour Benzer Glenn W. Burton Mildred Cohn 1983 Howard L. Bachrach Paul Berg Wendell L. Roelofs Berta Scharrer 1986 Stanley Cohen Donald A. Henderson Vernon B. Mountcastle George Emil Palade Joan A. Steitz 1987 Michael E. DeBakey Theodor O. Diener Harry Eagle Har Gobind Khorana Rita Levi-Montalcini 1988 Michael S. Brown Stanley Norman Cohen Joseph L. Goldstein Maurice R. Hilleman Eric R. Kandel Rosalyn Sussman Yalow 1989 Katherine Esau Viktor Hamburger Philip Leder Joshua Lederberg Roger W. Sperry Harland G. Wood 1990s 1990 Baruj Benacerraf Herbert W. Boyer Daniel E. Koshland Jr. Edward B. Lewis David G. Nathan E. Donnall Thomas 1991 Mary Ellen Avery G. Evelyn Hutchinson Elvin A. Kabat Salvador Luria Paul A. Marks Folke K. Skoog Paul C. Zamecnik 1992 Maxine Singer Howard Martin Temin 1993 Daniel Nathans Salome G. Waelsch 1994 Thomas Eisner Elizabeth F. Neufeld 1995 Alexander Rich 1996 Ruth Patrick 1997 James Watson Robert A. Weinberg 1998 Bruce Ames Janet Rowley 1999 David Baltimore Jared Diamond Lynn Margulis 2000s 2000 Nancy C. Andreasen Peter H. Raven Carl Woese 2001 Francisco J. Ayala Mario R. Capecchi Ann Graybiel Gene E. Likens Victor A. McKusick Harold Varmus 2002 James E. Darnell Evelyn M. Witkin 2003 J. Michael Bishop Solomon H. Snyder Charles Yanofsky 2004 Norman E. Borlaug Phillip A. Sharp Thomas E. Starzl 2005 Anthony S. Fauci Torsten N. Wiesel 2006 Rita R. Colwell Nina Fedoroff Lubert Stryer 2007 Robert J. Lefkowitz Bert W. OMalley 2008 Francis S. Collins Elaine Fuchs J. Craig Venter 2009 Susan L. Lindquist Stanley B. Prusiner 2010s 2010 Ralph L. Brinster Shu Chien Rudolf Jaenisch 2011 Lucy Shapiro Leroy Hood Sallie Chisholm 2014 May Berenbaum Bruce Alberts 2015 Stanley Falkow Rakesh K. Jain Mary-Claire King Simon Levin Chemistry 1980s 1982 F. Albert Cotton Gilbert Stork 1983 Roald Hoffmann George C. Pimentel Richard N. Zare 1986 Harry B. Gray Yuan Tseh Lee Carl S. Marvel Frank H. Westheimer 1987 William S. Johnson Walter H. Stockmayer Max Tishler 1988 William O. Baker Konrad E. Bloch Elias J. Corey 1989 Richard B. Bernstein Melvin Calvin Rudolph A. Marcus Harden M. McConnell 1990s 1990 Elkan Blout Karl Folkers John D. Roberts 1991 Ronald Breslow Gertrude B. Elion Dudley R. Herschbach Glenn T. Seaborg 1992 Howard E. Simmons Jr. 1993 Donald J. Cram Norman Hackerman 1994 George S. Hammond 1995 Thomas Cech Isabella L. Karle 1996 Norman Davidson 1997 Darleane C. Hoffman Harold S. Johnston 1998 John W. Cahn George M. Whitesides 1999 Stuart A. Rice John Ross Susan Solomon 2000s 2000 John D. Baldeschwieler Ralph F. Hirschmann 2001 Ernest R. Davidson Gbor A. Somorjai 2002 John I. Brauman 2004 Stephen J. Lippard 2006 Marvin H. Caruthers Peter B. Dervan 2007 Mostafa A. El-Sayed 2008 Joanna Fowler JoAnne Stubbe 2009 Stephen J. Benkovic Marye Anne Fox 2010s 2010 Jacqueline K. Barton Peter J. Stang 2011 Allen J. Bard M. Frederick Hawthorne 2014 Judith P. Klinman Jerrold Meinwald 2015 A. Paul Alivisatos Geraldine L. Richmond Engineering sciences 1960s 1962 Theodore von Krmn 1963 Vannevar Bush John Robinson Pierce 1964 Charles S. Draper 1965 Hugh L. Dryden Clarence L. Johnson Warren K. Lewis 1966 Claude E. Shannon 1967 Edwin H. Land Igor I. Sikorsky 1968 J. Presper Eckert Nathan M. Newmark 1969 Jack St. Clair Kilby 1970s 1970 George E. Mueller 1973 Harold E. Edgerton Richard T. Whitcomb 1974 Rudolf Kompfner Ralph Brazelton Peck Abel Wolman 1975 Manson Benedict William Hayward Pickering Frederick E. Terman Wernher von Braun 1976 Morris Cohen Peter C. Goldmark Erwin Wilhelm Mller 1979 Emmett N. Leith Raymond D. Mindlin Robert N. Noyce Earl R. Parker Simon Ramo 1980s 1982 Edward H. Heinemann Donald L. Katz 1983 Bill Hewlett George Low John G. Trump 1986 Hans Wolfgang Liepmann Tung-Yen Lin Bernard M. Oliver 1987 Robert Byron Bird H. Bolton Seed Ernst Weber 1988 Daniel C. Drucker Willis M. Hawkins George W. Housner 1989 Harry George Drickamer Herbert E. Grier 1990s 1990 Mildred Dresselhaus Nick Holonyak Jr. 1991 George H. Heilmeier Luna B. Leopold H. Guyford Stever 1992 Calvin F. Quate John Roy Whinnery 1993 Alfred Y. Cho 1994 Ray W. Clough 1995 Hermann A. Haus 1996 James L. Flanagan C. Kumar N. Patel 1998 Eli Ruckenstein 1999 Kenneth N. Stevens 2000s 2000 Yuan-Cheng B. Fung 2001 Andreas Acrivos 2002 Leo Beranek 2003 John M. Prausnitz 2004 Edwin N. Lightfoot 2005 Jan D. Achenbach Tobin J. Marks 2006 Robert S. Langer 2007 David J. Wineland 2008 Rudolf E. Klmn 2009 Amnon Yariv 2010s 2010 Shu Chien 2011 John B. Goodenough 2014 Thomas Kailath Mathematical, statistical, and computer sciences 1960s 1963 Norbert Wiener 1964 Solomon Lefschetz H. Marston Morse 1965 Oscar Zariski 1966 John Milnor 1967 Paul Cohen 1968 Jerzy Neyman 1969 William Feller 1970s 1970 Richard Brauer 1973 John Tukey 1974 Kurt Gdel 1975 John W. Backus Shiing-Shen Chern George Dantzig 1976 Kurt Otto Friedrichs Hassler Whitney 1979 Joseph L. Doob Donald E. Knuth 1980s 1982 Marshall Harvey Stone 1983 Herman Goldstine Isadore Singer 1986 Peter Lax Antoni Zygmund 1987 Raoul Bott Michael Freedman 1988 Ralph E. Gomory Joseph B. Keller 1989 Samuel Karlin Saunders Mac Lane Donald C. Spencer 1990s 1990 George F. Carrier Stephen Cole Kleene John McCarthy 1991 Alberto Caldern 1992 Allen Newell 1993 Martin David Kruskal 1994 John Cocke 1995 Louis Nirenberg 1996 Richard Karp Stephen Smale 1997 Shing-Tung Yau 1998 Cathleen Synge Morawetz 1999 Felix Browder Ronald R. Coifman 2000s 2000 John Griggs Thompson Karen Uhlenbeck 2001 Calyampudi R. Rao Elias M. Stein 2002 James G. Glimm 2003 Carl R. de Boor 2004 Dennis P. Sullivan 2005 Bradley Efron 2006 Hyman Bass 2007 Leonard Kleinrock Andrew J. Viterbi 2009 David B. Mumford 2010s 2010 Richard A. Tapia S. R. Srinivasa Varadhan 2011 Solomon W. Golomb Barry Mazur 2014 Alexandre Chorin David Blackwell 2015 Michael Artin Physical sciences 1960s 1963 Luis W. Alvarez 1964 Julian Schwinger Harold Clayton Urey Robert Burns Woodward 1965 John Bardeen Peter Debye Leon M. Lederman William Rubey 1966 Jacob Bjerknes Subrahmanyan Chandrasekhar Henry Eyring John H. Van Vleck Vladimir K. Zworykin 1967 Jesse Beams Francis Birch Gregory Breit Louis Hammett George Kistiakowsky 1968 Paul Bartlett Herbert Friedman Lars Onsager Eugene Wigner 1969 Herbert C. Brown Wolfgang Panofsky 1970s 1970 Robert H. Dicke Allan R. Sandage John C. Slater John A. Wheeler Saul Winstein 1973 Carl Djerassi Maurice Ewing Arie Jan Haagen-Smit Vladimir Haensel Frederick Seitz Robert Rathbun Wilson 1974 Nicolaas Bloembergen Paul Flory William Alfred Fowler Linus Carl Pauling Kenneth Sanborn Pitzer 1975 Hans A. Bethe Joseph O. Hirschfelder Lewis Sarett Edgar Bright Wilson Chien-Shiung Wu 1976 Samuel Goudsmit Herbert S. Gutowsky Frederick Rossini Verner Suomi Henry Taube George Uhlenbeck 1979 Richard P. Feynman Herman Mark Edward M. Purcell John Sinfelt Lyman Spitzer Victor F. Weisskopf 1980s 1982 Philip W. Anderson Yoichiro Nambu Edward Teller Charles H. Townes 1983 E. Margaret Burbidge Maurice Goldhaber Helmut Landsberg Walter Munk Frederick Reines Bruno B. Rossi J. Robert Schrieffer 1986 Solomon J. Buchsbaum H. Richard Crane Herman Feshbach Robert Hofstadter Chen-Ning Yang 1987 Philip Abelson Walter Elsasser Paul C. Lauterbur George Pake James A. Van Allen 1988 D. Allan Bromley Paul Ching-Wu Chu Walter Kohn Norman F. Ramsey Jack Steinberger 1989 Arnold O. Beckman Eugene Parker Robert Sharp Henry Stommel 1990s 1990 Allan M. Cormack Edwin M. McMillan Robert Pound Roger Revelle 1991 Arthur L. Schawlow Ed Stone Steven Weinberg 1992 Eugene M. Shoemaker 1993 Val Fitch Vera Rubin 1994 Albert Overhauser Frank Press 1995 Hans Dehmelt Peter Goldreich 1996 Wallace S. Broecker 1997 Marshall Rosenbluth Martin Schwarzschild George Wetherill 1998 Don L. Anderson John N. Bahcall 1999 James Cronin Leo Kadanoff 2000s 2000 Willis E. Lamb Jeremiah P. Ostriker Gilbert F. White 2001 Marvin L. Cohen Raymond Davis Jr. Charles Keeling 2002 Richard Garwin W. Jason Morgan Edward Witten 2003 G. Brent Dalrymple Riccardo Giacconi 2004 Robert N. Clayton 2005 Ralph A. Alpher Lonnie Thompson 2006 Daniel Kleppner 2007 Fay Ajzenberg-Selove Charles P. Slichter 2008 Berni Alder James E. Gunn 2009 Yakir Aharonov Esther M. Conwell Warren M. Washington 2010s 2011 Sidney Drell Sandra Faber Sylvester James Gates 2012 Burton Richter Sean C. Solomon 2014 Shirley Ann Jackson v t e NASA Policy and history History NACA 1915 National Aeronautics and Space Act 1958 Space Task Group 1958 Paine 1986 Rogers 1986 Ride 1987 Space Exploration Initiative 1989 Augustine 1990 U.S. National Space Policy 1996 CFUSAI 2002 CAIB 2003 Vision for Space Exploration 2004 Aldridge 2004 Augustine 2009 General Space Race Administrator and Deputy Administrator Chief Scientist Astronaut Corps Ranks and positions Chief Budget Spin-off technologies NASA TV NASA Social Launch Services Program Mercury Control Center Kennedy Space Center Vehicle Assembly Building Launch Complex 39 Launch Control Center Operations and Checkout Building Johnson Space Center Mission Control Lunar Sample Laboratory Robotic programs Past Hitchhiker Mariner Mariner Mark II MESUR Mars Surveyor 98 New Millennium Lunar Orbiter Pioneer Planetary Observer Ranger Surveyor Viking Project Prometheus Mars Scout Mars Exploration Rover Current Living With a Star Lunar Precursor Robotic Program Earth Observing System Great Observatories program Explorer Small explorer Voyager Discovery New Frontiers Solar Terrestrial Probes Commercial Lunar Payload Services Human spaceflight programs Past X-15   suborbital  Mercury Gemini Apollo ApolloSoyuz Test Project  with the   Soviet space program  Skylab Space Shuttle ShuttleMir  with   Roscosmos State Corporation  Constellation Current International Space Station Commercial Orbital Transportation Services Commercial Crew Development Orion Artemis Lunar Gateway Individual featured missions human and robotic Past COBE Mercury 3 Mercury-Atlas 6 Magellan Pioneer 10 Pioneer 11 Galileo GALEX GRAIL WMAP Space Shuttle Sojourner rover Spirit rover LADEE MESSENGER Aquarius Cassini Dawn Kepler space telescope Opportunity rover RHESSI observed Currently operating Mars Reconnaissance Orbiter 2001 Mars Odyssey New Horizons International Space Station Hubble Space Telescope Spitzer Swift THEMIS Mars Exploration Rover Curiosity rover timeline InSight GOES 14 Lunar Reconnaissance Orbiter GOES 15 Van Allen Probes Solar Dynamics Observatory Juno Mars Science Laboratory timeline NuSTAR Voyager 1 Voyager 2 WISE MAVEN MMS OSIRIS-REx Transiting Exoplanet Survey Satellite Future Joint Polar Satellite System James Webb Space Telescope Wide Field Infrared Survey Telescope Mars 2020 NISAR Europa Clipper Communications and navigation Near Earth Network Space Network Deep Space Network  Goldstone Madrid Canberra Space Flight Operations Facility  Deep Space Atomic Clock NASA lists Astronauts by name by year Gemini astronauts Apollo astronauts List of NASA aircraft List of NASA missions uncrewed missions List of NASA contractors List of United States rockets List of NASA cancellations List of Space Shuttle missions crews List of NASA cameras on spacecraft NASA images and artwork Earthrise The Blue Marble Family Portrait Pale Blue Dot Pillars of Creation Mystic Mountain Solar System Family Portrait The Day the Earth Smiled Fallen Astronaut Lunar plaques Pioneer plaques Voyager Golden Record Apollo 11 goodwill messages NASA insignia Gemini and Apollo medallions Mission patches Related Apollo 15 postal covers incident Space Mirror Memorial The Astronaut Monument U.S. Astronaut Hall of Fame Space program on U.S. stamps Apollo 17 Moon mice Other primates in space NASA spinoff technologies Category Authority control BNE  XX865227 BNF  cb12374590j data GND  118514652 ISNI  0000 0001 2132 837X LCCN  n79114065 MGP  155196 NARA  10580407 NDL  00520287 NKC  xx0053918 NLA  35852072 NLA-person  1116074 NTA  070343403 SELIBR  100239 SNAC  w6kf2mv0 SUDOC  032784058 VIAF  51769292 WorldCat Identities via VIAF 51769292 Retrieved from  httpsen.wikipedia.orgwindex.phptitleWernher_von_Braun oldid913916302  Categories  Wernher von Braun 1912 births 1977 deaths 20th-century American architects 20th-century American engineers 20th-century American physicists 20th-century American writers American aerospace engineers American technology writers Apollo program Barons of Germany Burials at Ivy Hill Cemetery Alexandria, Virginia Converts to Evangelicalism from Lutheranism Deaths from cancer in Virginia Deaths from pancreatic cancer Directors of the Marshall Space Flight Center Early spaceflight scientists ETH Zurich alumni Franzsisches Gymnasium Berlin alumni German aerospace engineers German architects German inventors German emigrants to the United States German physicists German rocket scientists Humboldt University of Berlin alumni Knights Commander of the Order of Merit of the Federal Republic of Germany NASA people National Medal of Science laureates Operation Paperclip Peenemnde Army Research Center and Airfield People from Huntsville, Alabama People from the Province of Posen People from Wyrzysk People with acquired American citizenship Pupils of Paul Hindemith Recipients of the Knights Cross of the War Merit Cross Recipients of the NASA Distinguished Service Medal Research and development in Nazi Germany Space advocates SS-Sturmbannfhrer Technical University of Berlin alumni Werner von Siemens Ring laureates V-weapons people Hidden categories Webarchive template wayback links CS1 errors deprecated parameters CS1 errors markup CS1 maint archived copy as title CS1 maint multiple names authors list CS1 long volume value CS1 German-language sources de Articles with short description Use mdy dates from January 2019 Use American English from April 2018 All Wikipedia articles written in American English Infobox person using alma mater Articles with hCards All articles with unsourced statements Articles with unsourced statements from January 2015 Articles with unsourced statements from July 2019 Articles with unsourced statements from December 2014 Articles with unsourced statements from November 2017 Articles with unsourced statements from April 2013 Articles needing additional references from January 2018 All articles needing additional references Articles with unsourced statements from July 2015 Articles needing additional references from April 2017 Interlanguage link template link number CS1 errors missing periodical Wikipedia articles with BNE identifiers Wikipedia articles with BNF identifiers Wikipedia articles with GND identifiers Wikipedia articles with ISNI identifiers Wikipedia articles with LCCN identifiers Wikipedia articles with MGP identifiers Wikipedia articles with NARA identifiers Wikipedia articles with NDL identifiers Wikipedia articles with NKC identifiers Wikipedia articles with NLA identifiers Wikipedia articles with NLA-person identifiers Wikipedia articles with NTA identifiers Wikipedia articles with SELIBR identifiers Wikipedia articles with SNAC-ID identifiers Wikipedia articles with SUDOC identifiers Wikipedia articles with VIAF identifiers Wikipedia articles with WorldCat-VIAF identifiers